Maryland, session 2025, SB0323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
3–202.
(a) (1) The statewide voter registration application shall:
(i) require the signature of the applicant, subject to the penalties of
perjury, by which the applicant swears or affirms that the information contained in the
registration application is true and that the applicant meets all of the qualifications to
become a registered voter;
(ii) state the penalties for the submission of a false application; and
(iii) provide the applicant with the opportunity to cancel a current
registration.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0323*

SENATE BILL 323
(2) The following information shall be made available to each applicant
who is completing a statewide voter registration application:
(i) the qualifications to become a registered voter;
(ii) if an individual declines to register, this fact will remain
confidential and be used only for voter registration purposes;
(iii) if an individual registers to vote, the office at which the
application is submitted will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration
purposes; and
(iv) notification to the applicant that submission of the form to an
individual other than an official, employee, or agent of a local board does not assure that
the form will be filed or filed in a timely manner.
(3) The statewide voter registration application may not require:
(i) notarization or other formal authentication; or
(ii) any additional information, other than the information
necessary to enable election officials to determine the eligibility of the applicant and to
administer voter registration and other parts of the election process.
(4) In the section of the statewide voter registration application that asks
the voter whether the voter wants to affiliate with a political party, the application shall
list the recognized political parties in the State and include the following statement: “You
must register with a political party if you want to take part in that political party’s primary
election, caucus, or convention. Check one box only.”.
(5) (i) A statewide voter registration application shall be produced
exclusively by the State Board.
(ii) No other registration form may be used for registration purposes
except:
1. a voter registration application produced by a local board
with the approval of the State Board;
2. as provided in subsection (b) of this section;
3. as provided in [§ 3–203(b)] § 3–203 of this subtitle;
4. any other form prescribed by federal law for voter
registration; or

SENATE BILL 323 3
5. a federal write–in absentee ballot if used by a voter
authorized to vote a federal write–in absentee ballot under federal law.
(b) The voter registration application form prescribed pursuant to the National
Voter Registration Act of 1993 shall satisfy the requirements prescribed under subsection
(a) of this section and be accepted by the appropriate election official for purposes of voter
registration.
(c) The application described in this section may be used by a registered voter to
change the voter’s name, address, or party affiliation.
(D) (1) A STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION APPLICATION SHALL
INCLUDE A RETURN ENVELOPE OR ENVELOPE TEMPLATE WITH PREPAID POSTAGE
THAT THE APPLICANT MAY USE TO RETURN THE APPLICATION TO THE STATE
BOARD.
(2) A STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION APPLICATION SHALL BE
ACCOMPANIED BY INSTRUCTIONS FOR POSTAGE, INCLUDING:
(I) A STATEMENT THAT THE RETURN ENVELOPE OR ENVELOPE
TEMPLATE INCLUDES PREPAID POSTAGE AND MAY BE MAILED AS IS; AND
(II) DIRECTIONS FOR HOW AN APPLICANT MAY ATTACH
POSTAGE FOR THE PURPOSE OF REDUCING THE COSTS OF THE LOCAL BOARD.
(3) RETURN ENVELOPES OR ENVELOPE TEMPLATES SHALL BE
PREPRINTED WITH THE ADDRESS OF THE STATE BOARD FOR PURPOSES OF
RETURNING THE STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION APPLICATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.